District of Columbia statutes.
50-2304.03

Scope of review.

Each appeals board shall review each case before it on the record and shall hold unlawful and set aside any action or findings and conclusions found to be:

(1)

Arbitrary, capricious, an abuse of discretion or otherwise not in accordance with law;

(2)

Repealed;

(3)

In excess of statutory jurisdiction, authority or limitations or short of statutory rights;

(4)

Without observance of procedure required by law, including any applicable procedure provided by this chapter; or

(5)

Unsupported by substantial evidence in the record of the proceedings before the appeals board.

Sept. 12, 1978, D.C. Law 2-104, § 403, 25 DCR 1275
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-279, § 301(j), 54 DCR 903

History

1981 Ed., § 40-633.
1973 Ed., § 40-1123.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 16-279 repealed par. (2), which formerly read:
“(2) Contrary to constitutional right, power, privilege or immunity;”

Effect of Amendments